Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 5. Areas Impacted by Economic Disaster.

Sec. 44.33.285.
Action by governor.

The governor may, upon recommendation of the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development, designate by proclamation an area as an area impacted by an economic disaster.
When an area is so designated, the legislature may appropriate money for assistance grants and the governor may recommend in the governor’s budget submission that capital projects planned for the area be accelerated and that new projects be funded for the area.
The proclamation may provide that waivers of capital projects requirements, as authorized in AS

44.33.300

, become effective only to the extent set out in the proclamation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 277 SLA 1976; am § 35 ch 113 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Sec. 44.33.290.
Employment preference.

In the performance of contracts awarded by the state in an area impacted by an economic disaster, residents of the area shall be employed where they are available and qualified so that the economic effects of alleviating the disaster will be maximized. If resident labor is not available, the contractor shall inform the Department of Labor and Workforce Development of the number of additional workers needed, the positions to be filled, and the efforts made at recruitment in the area. If the Department of Labor and Workforce Development is satisfied that a good faith effort has been made by the contractor to hire residents of the area, it may issue a certificate allowing other hire for designated positions. A clause requiring these provisions shall be part of each state contract awarded.

Wages paid for employment under this section shall be in conformance with the minimum rates of pay schedule published by the Department of Labor and Workforce Development in accordance with AS

36.05.030

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 277 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 44.33.295.
Contractors’ preference.

If the department determines that there are contractors in an area designated as an area impacted by an economic disaster and who are qualified to perform a contract, preference to the extent feasible shall be given to those contractors under regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 277 SLA 1976)

Sec. 44.33.300.
Waiver of certain provisions.

When the governor has by proclamation declared an area impacted by an economic disaster, the following provisions regarding public contracts may be waived to the extent specified in the proclamation:

the requirement of a contractor’s bond as prescribed in AS

36.25.010

may be waived if the contract amount does not exceed $100,000;

the public bid requirements as contained in AS

19.10.170

, AS

19.30.191(b)

, AS

35.15.010

—

35.15.020

, and AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code) may be waived if the contract is to be performed by a contractor whose principal office is in the designated area and the contract amount does not exceed $50,000;

the general policy to require all construction to be under bid contract as contained in AS

19.10.170

, AS

35.15.010

, and AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code) may be waived if the contract is to be performed by the state, another governmental entity, or a nonprofit entity.

History.

(§ 1 ch 277 SLA 1976; am § 44 ch 106 SLA 1986)

Sec. 44.33.305.
Regulations.

The department, after consultation with the Department of Labor and Workforce Development, may adopt regulations to implement AS

44.33.285

—

44.33.310

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 277 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 44.33.310.
Definitions.

In AS

44.33.285

—

44.33.310

,

“base period” means any 10 years after 1950, not necessarily continuous, and if the economic disaster is caused by a fisheries failure the period shall consist of years during which a fishery produced at economically representative levels as determined by the Department of Fish and Game;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“economic disaster” means that the annual income to workers in the designated area dropped below the average annual income for the base period for workers in the designated area and the drop in income is of such magnitude that the average family income of all residents of the designated area as determined by the department is below the poverty guidelines issued by the federal Department of Health and Human Services, adjusted by the department to reflect subsistence economic patterns and appropriate cost-of-living differentials; the availability of alternate employment shall be considered in determining whether an economic disaster has occurred under this paragraph.

History.

(§ 1 ch 277 SLA 1976; am § 33 ch 168 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in this section, Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For federal poverty guidelines, see aspe.hhs.gov/poverty-guidelines.

Secs. 44.33.320 — 44.33.380.
Residential Care Facility Revolving Loan Fund. [Repealed, § 72 ch 113 SLA 1982.]

Secs. 44.33.401 — 44.33.430.
Cultural Facilities Grants. [Repealed, § 2 ch 97 SLA 1986.]